Utah statutes.
17-18a-505.   Escheats to the state.

The civil counsel shall:

(1)  assist in determining what estate or property located within the county escheates or reverts to the state; and

(2)  provide assistance to the county assessor and the state auditor in discovering and recovering an escheat.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

